Hawaii, session 2025, HB533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 6E-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "historic property" to read as follows: ""Historic property" means any building, structure, object, district, area, or site, including heiau and underwater site, [which is over fifty years old.] that is included on, or eligible for inclusion on, the national register of historic places or Hawaii register of historic places. "Historic property" includes any artifacts, records, and material remains relating to the building, structure, object, district, area, or site." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.